Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10C-702] Relation to other laws. Solely
for the purposes of this article, neither a transportation network company nor
a transportation network company driver shall be deemed to be a common carrier
by motor vehicle, a contract carrier by motor vehicle, a motor carrier as
defined in section 271-4, a taxicab, or a for-hire vehicle service. [L 2016, c
236, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next